Utah statutes.
70A-7a-309.   Duty of care -- Contractual limitation of carrier's liability.
(1)  A carrier that issues a bill of lading, whether negotiable or
nonnegotiable, shall exercise the degree of care in relation to the goods
which a reasonably careful person would exercise under similar circumstances.
This Subsection (1) does not affect any statute, regulation, or rule of law
that imposes liability upon a common carrier for damages not caused by its
negligence.
(2)  Damages may be limited by a term in the bill of lading or in a
transportation agreement that the carrier's liability may not exceed a value
stated in the bill or transportation agreement if the carrier's rates are
dependent upon value and the consignor is afforded an opportunity to declare a
higher value and the consignor is advised of the opportunity.  However, such a
limitation is not effective with respect to the carrier's liability for
conversion to its own use.
(3)  Reasonable provisions as to the time and manner of presenting claims and
commencing actions based on the shipment may be included in a bill of lading
or a transportation agreement.
